Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.260

Scope of authority.

The authority granted in this chapter shall apply equally to the generating of electricity by water power, by steam power, by nuclear power, conservation, or by any other means whatsoever.

[ 1987 c 376 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 184 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.52.260. Prior: 1955 c 258 s 18; 1953 c 281 s 20.]